Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.766

Risk management—Office created—Powers and duties.

There is hereby created an office of risk management within the department of enterprise services. The director shall implement the risk management policy in RCW 43.19.760 through the office of risk management. The director shall appoint a risk manager to supervise the office of risk management. The office of risk management shall make recommendations when appropriate to state agencies on the application of prudent safety, security, loss prevention, and loss minimization methods so as to reduce or avoid risk or loss.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 502; 2002 c 332 s 7; 1998 c 245 s 55; 1987 c 505 s 25; 1985 c 188 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 270 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.41.300, 43.19.19362.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.